Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.220

County road property tax revenues, expenditure for services authorized.

The legislative authority of any county may budget, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 36.40 RCW, and expend any portion of the county road property tax revenues for any service to be provided in the unincorporated area of the county notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter 36.82 RCW and RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043. County road property tax revenues that are diverted under chapter 39.89 RCW may be expended as provided under chapter 39.89 RCW.

[ 2001 c 212 s 25; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 142; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 32; 1971 ex.s. c 25 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 25: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 25 s 4.]